Wyoming, session 2026, SF0031.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 34-30-101 through 34-30-107 are
created to read:
CHAPTER 30
UNIFORM MORTGAGE MODIFICATION ACT
34-30-101. Short title.
This act may be cited as the Uniform Mortgage Modification
Act.
34-30-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(i) "Electronic" means relating to technology
having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical,
electromagnetic or similar capabilities;
(ii) "Financial covenant" means an undertaking
to demonstrate an obligor's creditworthiness or the
adequacy of security provided by an obligor;
(iii) "Modification" includes a change,
amendment, revision, correction, addition, supplementation,
elimination, waiver or restatement;
(iv) "Mortgage":
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0031
ENROLLED ACT NO. 3, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) Means an agreement that creates a
consensual interest in real property to secure payment or
performance of an obligation, regardless of:
(I) How the agreement is denominated,
including a mortgage, deed of trust, trust deed, security
deed, indenture or deed to secure debt; and
(II) Whether the agreement also
creates a security interest in personal property.
(B) Does not include an agreement that
creates a consensual interest to secure liability owned by
a unit owner to a condominium association, owners'
association or cooperative housing association for
association dues, fees or assessments.
(v) "Mortgage modification" means modification
of:
(A) A mortgage;
(B) An agreement that creates an
obligation, including a promissory note, loan agreement or
credit agreement; or
(C) An agreement that creates other
security or credit enhancement for an obligation, including
an assignment of leases or rents or a guaranty.
(vi) "Obligation" means a debt, duty or other
liability, secured by a mortgage;
(vii) "Obligor" means a person that:
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0031
ENROLLED ACT NO. 3, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) Owes payment or performance of an
obligation;
(B) Signs a mortgage; or
(C) Is otherwise accountable, or whose
property serves as collateral, for payment or performance
of an obligation.
(viii) "Recognized index" means an index to
which changes in the interest rate may be linked that is:
(A) Readily available to, and verifiable
by, the obligor; and
(B) Beyond the control of the person to
whom the obligation is owed.
(ix) "Record", used as a noun, means
information:
(A) Inscribed on a tangible medium; or
(B) Stored in an electronic or other medium
and retrievable in perceivable form.
(x) "Sign" means, with present intent to
authenticate or adopt a record:
(A) Execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(B) Attach to or logically associate with
the record an electronic symbol, sound or process.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0031
ENROLLED ACT NO. 3, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(xi) "This act" means W.S. 34-30-101 through
34-30-107.
34-30-103. Scope.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, this act applies to a mortgage modification.
(b) This act does not affect:
(i) Law governing the required content of a
mortgage;
(ii) A statute of limitations or other law
governing the expiration or termination of a right to
enforce an obligation or a mortgage;
(iii) A recording statute;
(iv) A statute governing the priority of a tax
lien or other governmental lien;
(v) A statute of frauds or the Uniform
Electronic Transactions Act;
(vi) Except as provided in W.S.
34-30-104(b)(viii), law governing the priority of a future
advance.
(c) This act does not apply to any of the following
modifications:
(i) A release of, or addition to, property
encumbered by a mortgage;
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0031
ENROLLED ACT NO. 3, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) A release of, addition of, or other change
in an obligor; or
(iii) An assignment or other transfer of a
mortgage or an obligation.
34-30-104. Effect of mortgage modification.
(a) For a mortgage modification described in
subsection (b) of this section:
(i) The mortgage continues to secure the
obligation as modified;
(ii) The priority of the mortgage is not
affected by the modification;
(iii) The mortgage retains its priority
regardless of whether a record of the mortgage modification
is recorded; and
(iv) The modification is not a novation.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section applies to one (1)
or more of the following mortgage modifications:
(i) An extension of the maturity date of an
obligation;
(ii) A decrease in the interest rate of an
obligation;
(iii) If the modification does not result in an
increase in the interest rate of an obligation as
calculated on the date the modification becomes effective:
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0031
ENROLLED ACT NO. 3, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) A change to a different index that is a
recognized index if the previous index to which changes in
the interest rate were linked is no longer available;
(B) A change in the differential between
the index and the interest rate;
(C) A change from a floating or adjustable
rate to a fixed rate; or
(D) A change from a fixed rate to a
floating or adjustable rate based on a recognized index.
(iv) A capitalization of unpaid interest or
other unpaid monetary obligation;
(v) A forgiveness, forbearance or other
reduction of principal, accrued interest or other monetary
obligation;
(vi) A modification of a requirement for
maintaining an escrow or reserve account for payment of an
obligation, including taxes and insurance premiums;
(vii) A modification of a requirement for
acquiring or maintaining insurance;
(viii) A modification of an existing condition
to advance funds;
(ix) A modification of a financial covenant; and
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0031
ENROLLED ACT NO. 3, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(x) A modification of the payment amount or
schedule resulting from another modification described in
this section.
(c) The effect of a mortgage modification not
described in subsection (b) of this section is not governed
by this act. This act shall not be construed to negate the
validity or priority of a mortgage modification not
described in subsection (b) of this section.
34-30-105. Uniformity of application; construction.
(a) In applying and construing this uniform act, a
court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the law
among jurisdictions that enact it.
(b) This act shall not be construed to negate the
validity or priority of a mortgage modification not
described in W.S. 34-30-104(b).
34-30-106. Relation to electronic signatures in
global and national commerce act.
This act modifies, limits or supersedes the Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. §
7001 et seq., as amended, but does not modify, limit or
supersede 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c), or authorize electronic
delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. §
7003(b).
34-30-107. Applicability.
This act applies to a mortgage modification made on or
after July 1, 2026 regardless of when the mortgage or
obligation was created.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0031
ENROLLED ACT NO. 3, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
8